Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4424
Refunding bonds; provisions applicable.

The issue of refunding bonds, the manner of sale, the maturities, interest rates, form, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the city in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of the Good Life District Economic Development Act relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable. The city may issue bonds for refunding and nonrefunding purposes as part of the same series of bonds.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 17.